South Dakota, session 2026, SB66.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 12-1:
The State Board of Elections may not authorize the use of any automatic tabulating
equipment or electronic ballot marking system.
The governing body of a political subdivision having supervision of an election may
not adopt, implement, or use any automatic tabulating or electronic ballot marking system
in an election.
Section 2. That § 12-16-2 be AMENDED:
12-16-2. All official ballots shall must be printed on good quality bond paper, in
black ink, and in the English language. The names of candidates for each office shall must
be printed in large type under the designation of the party for which the nomination is
made, so that all the names of candidates for each party are in separate columns, the
names of candidates for each office are directly opposite each other, and the names of all
independent candidates occupy a separate column under the heading, independent
candidates. In precincts using automatic tabulating systems, the ballot information,
whether placed on the ballot or on the marking device, shall, as far as practicable, be in
the order or arrangement provided for paper ballots except that such information may be
in vertical or horizontal rows, or on a number of separate pages. No An individual race or
ballot question may not be divided between pages. One ballot card may be used for
recording a voter's vote on all races and measures.
Section 3. That § 12-18-1 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.321.14 2 66
12-18-1. The superintendent of the election precinct is responsible for having the
polling place ready to accommodate the voters in the precinct by the time the polls open.
The booths, electronic ballot marking system, and supplies which that enable the voter to
complete the voter's ballot shall must be provided by the person in charge of the election.
If a voter chooses to use a sip and puff device or an A/B switch device with the electronic
ballot marking system, the voter shall provide such device. All voting at the polling place
shall must be in private voting booths or compartments and, except as provided in § 12-
18-25, shall must be screened from observation.
Section 4. That § 12-19-43 be AMENDED:
12-19-43. The county auditor shall direct the board to meet on election day prior
to the closing of the polls for the sole purpose of reviewing the absentee voters' affidavits
appearing on the sealed ballot envelopes, if in the auditor's judgment this procedure shall
be is necessary due to the number of absentee ballots received. The absentee ballots shall
must be opened, stamped, and placed in the ballot box or processed by an automatic
tabulating machine, but under no circumstances shall the ballots but may not be manually
counted nor any vote totals printed or displayed by any tabulating machine prior to the
closing of the polls. If ballots are processed by an automatic tabulating machine prior to
the closing of the polls, the resolution board shall be present and notification of such
processing shall be provided to each county party chairperson at least ten days before the
election.
Section 5. That § 12-20-1 be AMENDED:
12-20-1. As soon as the polls are closed, the precinct superintendent and precinct
deputies shall must audit the ballot count, as prescribed in §§ 12-20-2 and 12-20-3. The
precinct superintendent and precinct deputies shall then immediately deliver the ballot
boxes, registration book, pollbook, and other election supplies, including voided and
unused ballots, to the counting board, if appointed, and sign a certificate of transmittal
and receipt, as prescribed by the State Board of Elections.
The Upon receipt of the ballot boxes, registration book, pollbook, and other election
supplies, the members of the precinct election board or the counting board, if appointed,
shall then must immediately proceed to count by hand, publicly, and in the presence of
all persons desiring to attend the count, the votes received at the polls, and continue
without leaving the site of the count until the count is completed. A person charged with
implementing this section may not delay the counting of ballots, other than to authorize
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.321.14 3 66
short recesses for the health and wellbeing of those employed to implement this section.
In counting the votes, the members of the precinct election board or counting board shall
use the tally sheets provided.
Section 6. That § 12-20-13 be AMENDED:
12-20-13. Except as provided in § 12-20-17, the county auditor shall tabulate
election returns as rapidly as received and make the result available for the information
of the public, but such returns are not. Any results made available pursuant to this section
may not be considered the official returns.
The county auditor shall enter the information into the central election reporting
system, by using any computer located in a county office which that is properly configured
and linked to the central state computer, immediately following the tabulation counting of
election returns from each precinct.
Section 7. That § 12-20-13.1 be AMENDED:
12-20-13.1. The person in charge of the election shall decide if the provisional
ballots are to be counted by hand or by automated tabulating equipment. If a decision is
made to count the ballots by hand, a provisional ballot counting board shall be appointed
as provided in § 12-15-1. If the provisional ballots are to be counted by automated
tabulating equipment, a resolution board and tabulation machine operators shall be
appointed as provided in chapter 12-17B appoint a provisional ballot counting board as
provided in § 12-15-1.
Section 8. That § 12-20-13.2 be AMENDED:
12-20-13.2. The provisional ballot counting board or resolution board and
tabulation machine operators shall convene one hour prior to the convening of the
canvassing board. The provisional ballots, which Any provisional ballot that the person in
charge of the election has determined are not to be invalid according to § 12-20-5.1, shall
must be counted.
Upon completion of the count, the provisional ballot counting board or resolution
board shall must complete a certification of the provisional ballot count and give the
certification to the canvassing board. The certification form shall be prescribed by the
State Board of Elections shall prescribe the form of the certification.
Section 9. That § 12-21-24 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.321.14 4 66
12-21-24. The county auditor shall provide the pollbooks, automatic tabulating
system election night print outs, sealed ballot boxes, any provisional ballots which that
were determined countable pursuant to § 12-20-13.2, any uncounted provisional ballots,
and any unopened absentee ballot envelopes to the recount board. The recount board is
authorized to make a determination whether any provisional ballots or absentee ballots
which that were determined not to be countable, shall be are counted, and those votes
shall must be added to the recount tally.
Section 10. That § 61-1-36 be AMENDED:
61-1-36. For the purposes of §§ 61-1-13 and 61-1-15 the term, employment,
does not apply to service performed:
(1) In the employ of:
(a) A church or convention or association of churches, or
(b) An organization which that is operated primarily for religious purposes and
which is operated, supervised, controlled, or principally supported by a
church or convention or association of churches; or
(2) By a duly ordained, commissioned, or licensed minister of a church in the exercise
of duties required by the church or by a member of a religious order in the exercise
of duties required by the order; or
(3) In the employ of a school which that is not an institution of higher education prior
to January 1, 1978; or in the employ of a governmental entity referred to in § 61-
1-13 after December 31, 1977, if the service is performed by an individual in the
exercise of duties:
(a) As an elected official;
(b) As a member of a legislative body, or a member of the judiciary, of a state
or political subdivision;
(c) As a member of the state national guard or air national guard;
(d) As an employee serving on a temporary basis in case of fire, storm, snow,
earthquake, flood, or similar emergency;
(e) In a position which that, under or pursuant to the laws of this state, is
designated as a major nontenured policymaking or advisory position, or a
policymaking position the performance of the duties of which ordinarily does
not require more than eight hours per week; or
(f) As a precinct election official or automatic tabulating system worker, if the
amount of remuneration received by the individual during the calendar year
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.321.14 5 66
for services as a precinct election official or automatic tabulating system
worker is less than one thousand dollars; or
(4) In a facility conducted for the purpose of carrying out a program of rehabilitation
for any individual whose earning capacity is impaired by age or physical or mental
deficiency or injury, or providing remunerative work for any individual who because
of impaired physical or mental capacity cannot be readily absorbed in the
competitive labor market, by an individual receiving such the rehabilitation or
remunerative work; or
(5) As part of an unemployment work-relief or work-training program assisted or
financed in whole or in part by any federal agency or an agency of a state or
political subdivision, by an individual receiving such the work relief or work
training; or
(6) By an inmate of a custodial or penal institution.
Section 11. That § 12-17B-1 be REPEALED.
Terms used in this chapter mean:
(1) "Automatic tabulating equipment," the apparatus necessary to automatically
examine and count votes as designated on ballots or entered directly into a
computer by means of a touch screen or other data entry device and data
processing machines which can be used for counting these votes and tabulating
results;
(2) "Ballot," paper ballots containing the names of candidates and statements of
measures to be voted on;
(3) "Counting location," any location selected by the person in charge of the election
for the counting of votes cast in an election. A counting location shall be within the
territorial jurisdiction of such person unless there is no suitable tabulating
equipment available within the jurisdiction. However, in any event, all counting
locations shall be within this state;
(4) "Electronic ballot marking system," any electronic device which marks votes on a
ballot;
(5) "Optical scan," a procedure in which votes are tabulated by means of examining
marks made in voting response locations on the ballots with an optical mark reader
(OMR);
(6) "Resolution board," a board at an automatic tabulating location comprised of a
representative from each political party having a candidate on the ballot and whose
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.321.14 6 66
candidate on the county-wide ballot at the last general election received at least
fifteen percent of the votes. The county auditor may request additional board
members balanced evenly by party. If the resolution board consists of more than
one member from each party, the party shall designate which member of the party
shall serve as co-leader of the resolution board. The co-leaders shall ensure that
each board member is conducting resolution board duties uniformly and in
accordance with applicable statutes and administrative rules. The board shall
determine the disposition of those ballots which cannot be properly counted by the
tabulating equipment and observe the activities at the counting location on behalf
of the board member's respective party affiliation. In strictly nonpartisan elections,
the resolution board shall be comprised of two persons who are not employees of
the jurisdiction conducting the election and shall be appointed by the person in
charge of the election.
Section 12. That § 12-17B-2 be REPEALED.
Any automatic tabulating or electronic ballot marking system used in an election
shall enable the voter to cast a vote for all offices and on all measures on which the voter
is entitled to vote. No automatic tabulating, electronic ballot marking, or election voting
equipment system may be connected to the internet. No ballot marking device may save
or tabulate votes marked on any system. Each system shall fulfill the requirements for
election assistance commission standards certification and be approved by the State Board
of Elections prior to distribution and use in this state. No system may be approved unless
the system fulfills the requirements as established by the State Board of Elections. Any
changes or modifications to an approved system shall be approved by the State Board of
Elections prior to distribution and use.
Section 13. That § 12-17B-3 be REPEALED.
Any governing body having supervision of elections within any political subdivision
may adopt, experiment with, or abandon any automatic tabulating or electronic ballot
marking system approved for use by the State Board of Elections. Any governing body
may use the system in all or some of the precincts within its jurisdiction or in combination
with any other type of voting system approved for use by the State Board of Elections.
Section 14. That § 12-17B-4 be REPEALED.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.321.14 7 66
The governing body of a political subdivision may contract with any county for the
use of an automatic tabulating or electronic ballot marking system for elections within the
political subdivision.
Section 15. That § 12-17B-5 be REPEALED.
Not more than ten days prior to an election, the person in charge of the election
shall conduct a test of the automatic tabulating equipment to ascertain that the equipment
will correctly count the votes cast for all offices and on all measures. The test must be
open to the public. The person in charge of the election shall notify the county chair of
each political party with a candidate on the ballot, any independent candidate or candidate
without party affiliation on the ballot, and the ballot question committees for or against
an initiated or referred measure or initiated constitutional amendment, of the testing of
the automatic tabulating equipment, one week before the test is conducted. The person
in charge of the election shall post notice of the time and place of the test in the same
manner as a public meeting agenda, pursuant to § 1-25-1.1. The person in charge of the
election shall post the notice of the time and place of the test to the secretary of state's
website.
If an errorless count by an automatic tabulating machine is achieved by the test,
the person in charge of the election shall certify the machine. The State Board of Elections
shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, prescribing the certification of properly
functioning automatic tabulating equipment under this section.
If an error is detected, the cause of the error shall be determined and corrected.
Once the error is corrected, the person in charge of the election shall conduct a new test
of the automatic tabulating equipment. The person in charge of the election may not
approve the automatic tabulating equipment until an errorless count is made.
Any additional testing required to achieve an errorless count must be open to the
public. The person in charge of the election shall post notice of the time and place of an
additional test in the same manner as a public meeting agenda, pursuant to § 1-25-1.1.
The person in charge of the election shall notify the county chair of each political party
with a candidate on the ballot, any independent candidate or candidate without party
affiliation on the ballot, and the ballot question committees for or against an initiated or
referred measure or initiated constitutional amendment of the testing of the automatic
tabulating equipment twenty-four hours prior to the test. The person in charge of the
election shall post the notice of the time and place of the additional test to the secretary
of state's website.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.321.14 8 66
The secretary of state shall provide each county auditor with the contact
information for any independent candidate, candidate without party affiliation appearing
on the ballot, and the ballot question committees for or against an initiated or referred
measure or initiated constitutional amendment in the auditor's county.
Section 16. That § 12-17B-5.1 be REPEALED.
The person in charge of the election shall test the automatic tabulating equipment
by processing a predetermined number of ballots on which are recorded a predetermined
number of valid votes for each candidate and measure. The test of the automatic
tabulating equipment must also include at least one ballot for each office that has votes
exceeding the number allowed by law in order to test the ability of the automatic tabulating
equipment to reject invalid votes. During the test, a different number of valid votes must
be assigned to each candidate for an office and for and against each measure. A ballot
used to test the automatic tabulating equipment must be clearly marked as a test ballot.
After each test, the testing materials and the predetermined number of ballots used during
the test must be sealed and retained in the same manner as election materials after an
election.
Section 17. That § 12-17B-5.2 be REPEALED.
After the conclusion of the testing of the automatic tabulating equipment, no
software or firmware updates may be made to the automatic tabulating equipment until
after the certification of the election results. Each automatic tabulating device must be
sealed with a unique numbered seal. The person in charge of the election shall verify
immediately prior to the official counting of the ballots that the seal has not been tampered
with since the testing period and certification process pursuant to § 12-17B-5. The State
Board of Elections shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, prescribing the
method of sealing automatic tabulating equipment pursuant to this section.
Section 18. That § 12-17B-6 be REPEALED.
The person in charge of the election shall provide a sufficient number of voting
equipment and supplies to accommodate the voters and avoid unreasonable waiting times
for casting ballots.
Section 19. That § 12-17B-6.1 be REPEALED.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.321.14 9 66
If a candidate for federal office appears on the ballot at a polling place, such polling
place is required to have an electronic ballot marking system present.
Section 20. That § 12-17B-7 be REPEALED.
Before entering the voting booth, any voter may request instruction in the proper
procedure for marking the ballot to ensure that the tabulating equipment is able to read
the vote cast. No instructions may be given to the voter while in the voting booth.
However, any voter using an electronic ballot marking system may request instruction in
the proper operation of the system at any time. No precinct official or person assisting a
voter may in any manner request, suggest, or seek to persuade or induce any voter to
cast a vote for any particular ticket, candidate, or measure to be voted on. All instructions
shall be given in such a manner that it may be observed by other persons in the polling
place.
Section 21. That § 12-17B-9 be REPEALED.
Upon completion of the voting and after sealing the ballot box, two of the members
of the precinct election board, of different major political parties, shall, by the most direct
route, transport the box to the central counting location designated by the person in
charge of the election or the ballots may be transported to the counting location by a
sheriff's deputy and two deputy county auditors, one of each major political party, or by
two deputy county auditors, one of each major political party.
Section 22. That § 12-17B-10 be REPEALED.
All proceedings at the counting location shall be under the direction of the person
in charge of the election and shall conform to the requirements of the voting system. The
proceedings shall be open to the public. No person, who is not employed or authorized for
the purpose, may touch any ballot, ballot box, or equipment used in the return of the
ballots to the counting location or the tabulation process.
Section 23. That § 12-17B-11 be REPEALED.
Except for any specially trained technicians representing the equipment vendor and
required for the operation of the automatic tabulating equipment, there shall be equal
representation from each political party having a candidate on the ballot and whose
candidate on the county-wide ballot at the last general election received at least fifteen
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.321.14 10 66
percent of the votes amongst those employed or authorized to receive, process, or
tabulate the ballots. The proposed list of employees shall be submitted to each county
party chairperson at least thirty days prior to the election. Each person shall, prior to
discharging any duties, take and subscribe to an oath as prescribed by the State Board of
Elections.
Section 24. That § 12-17B-12 be REPEALED.
The test required by § 12-17B-5 shall be repeated immediately before the start of
the official count of the ballots.
Section 25. That § 12-17B-13 be REPEALED.
The procedure for tabulating the votes by the automatic tabulating equipment shall
be under the direction of the person in charge of the election, and shall conform to the
specifications and requirements of the automatic tabulating equipment. The results
printed by the automatic tabulating equipment shall constitute the immediate unofficial
returns. These returns shall be open to the public. The final returns printed by the
automatic tabulating equipment shall be presented to the canvassing board for review and
certification as the official returns.
Section 26. That § 12-17B-13.1 be REPEALED.
If automatic tabulating equipment is located at a polling place for processing ballots
while the polls are open, the equipment may not be operated in a manner which returns
an over-voted or partially under-voted ballot to the voter. The equipment shall be operated
in a manner which returns any ballot that appears to the tabulating equipment to be blank
or has any possible mark which the tabulating equipment cannot determine. If the ballot
is returned to the voter, the voter may choose to remark the ballot, obtain a new ballot,
or resubmit the ballot.
Any central count automatic tabulating equipment shall contain the capability to
out-stack ballots and shall be operated in a manner to out-stack any ballot which appears
to the tabulating equipment to be blank or has any possible mark which the tabulating
equipment cannot determine. If the ballot contains any such mark, the resolution board
shall examine the mark and make a determination of any individual vote according to the
rules promulgated pursuant to chapter 1-26 by the state board of elections. The resolution
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.321.14 11 66
board shall make a duplicate ballot as prescribed in § 12-17B-14 which shall be counted
by the automatic tabulating equipment.
Section 27. That § 12-17B-14 be REPEALED.
The resolution board shall determine the disposition of those ballots which cannot
be properly counted by the tabulating equipment. A true duplicate copy shall be made of
any ballot in question and substituted for the rejected ballot. All duplicate ballots shall be
clearly labeled "duplicate," shall bear a serial number which shall be registered on the
rejected ballot, and shall be counted in lieu of the rejected ballot. The resolution board
may observe the activities at the counting location on behalf of their respective political
party.
Section 28. That § 12-17B-15 be REPEALED.
After the tabulating procedure is completed, the ballots shall be placed in boxes
and resealed. Any program board which may be used in the automatic tabulating
equipment shall be removed and stored similarly to the ballots.
Section 29. That § 12-17B-16 be REPEALED.
Automatic tabulating equipment must be tested prior to a recount or election
contest as provided in §§ 12-17B-5 to 12-17B-5.2, inclusive, and then the official ballots
must be recounted. The recount board shall certify the new returns printed by the
automatic tabulating equipment as the official returns for the election. The person in
charge of the election shall sign and seal the new returns printed by the automatic
tabulating equipment and make the new returns public.
Section 30. That § 12-17B-17 be REPEALED.
The State Board of Elections may promulgate rules pursuant to chapter 1-26
concerning:
(1) The criteria and procedure for approving voting systems pursuant to this chapter;
(2) Notices and forms;
(3) Test procedures; and
(4) The arrangement and conduct of voting, absentee voting, tabulating, preparing
returns, and recounts.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.321.14 12 66
Section 31. That § 12-17B-18 be REPEALED.
Within fifteen days following the completion of the state canvassing of a primary
or general election, the auditor of each county shall conduct a post-election audit of the
ballots cast in the election following the procedures listed in this section and §§ 12-17B-
19 to 12-17B-25, inclusive. The county auditor shall appoint a county auditing board of
sufficient size to promptly complete the audit.
The members of the county auditing board may not all be members of the same
political party. A member of the county auditing board must be a registered voter in the
county in which the audit takes place. An individual may not serve on the county auditing
board if the individual is a candidate for the office that is on the ballot being audited.
The State Board of Elections shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26,
prescribing the oath that each member of a county auditing board must take prior to
discharging any duties.
Section 32. That § 12-17B-19 be REPEALED.
The office of the secretary of state shall reimburse each county for the cost of any
post-election audit required by §§ 12-17B-18 to 12-17B-25, inclusive. The State Board of
Elections shall promulgate rules, pursuant to chapter 1-26, administering the
reimbursement process and defining reimbursable expenses and reimbursement rates for
post-election audits.
Section 33. That § 12-17B-20 be REPEALED.
The post-election audit must be conducted in five percent of the precincts in the
county by manually counting all votes cast in two contests and comparing the results of
the manual count to the results for those precincts at the county canvass. The county
auditor shall select the precincts for the audit at random without the use of a computer in
public during the meeting of the county canvassing board. If the combined total of all
ballots cast in the precincts selected does not exceed one hundred ballots, then additional
precincts must be randomly selected until the total of all ballots exceeds one hundred
ballots. For the purposes of this section, the term precinct includes vote centers, but does
not include any precinct designated as an absentee precinct.
The county auditor shall select the contests for the audit at random without the
use of a computer in public during the meeting of the county canvassing board. One
contest randomly selected for the audit must be a statewide contest. If there are no
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.321.14 13 66
statewide contests on the ballot, the auditor randomly shall select another contest on the
ballot. If there is only one contest on the ballot, that contest must be audited.
Section 34. That § 12-17B-21 be REPEALED.
A post-election audit conducted pursuant to §§ 12-17B-18 to 12-17B-25, inclusive,
must be open to the public. Members of the public shall keep a reasonable distance so as
to not interfere with the audit process. The county auditor shall post notice of the time
and place of the audit in the same manner as a public meeting agenda pursuant to § 1-
25-1.1 and provide the notice to the county chair of each political party that has a
candidate on the ballot. The person in charge of the election shall post the notice of the
time and place of the audit to the secretary of state's website.
Section 35. That § 12-17B-22 be REPEALED.
The county auditor shall send the results of the post-election audit to the secretary
of state and present the results of the audit to the county commission at its next meeting.
The results of the audit shall be included in the minutes of the county commission meeting.
The secretary of state shall publish the results of the post-election audit on the
secretary of state's website.
Section 36. That § 12-17B-23 be REPEALED.
If the results of the post-election audit show a discrepancy in the results greater
than the margin by which any contest for elected office on the ballot in the county was
decided, the auditor shall notify the candidates for that office. Any candidate who receives
a notification from the county auditor shall have an additional seven days from the date
from when the auditor sends the notification to file a verified petition requesting a recount
of the official returns pursuant to §§ 12-21-10 or 12-21-11. The petition may be filed
regardless of the margin by which the contest was decided.
Section 37. That § 12-17B-24 be REPEALED.
If a recount of any contest is conducted in a county, the county auditor is not
required to conduct a post-election audit pursuant to § 12-17B-18.
Section 38. That § 12-17B-25 be REPEALED.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.321.14 14 66
The county auditor shall reseal and retain the ballots upon the completion of a
post-election audit pursuant to § 12-20-31.
Section 39. That § 12-19-52 be REPEALED.
In those counties which have adopted an electronic voting system, counting shall
be as prescribed in chapter 12-17B.
Section 40. This Act is effective beginning December 1, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.